Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA ZOO; ANIMAL HOSPITAL AND ASSET PRESERVATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $21,475,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Minnesota Zoological Board for capital improvements at the Minnesota Zoo. new text end new text begin (b) Of this amount, $17,675,000 is to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new animal hospital building at the Minnesota Zoological Garden. new text end new text begin (c) Of this amount, $3,800,000 is for capital asset preservation improvements and betterments to infrastructure and exhibits at the Minnesota Zoo, to be spent in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307. Notwithstanding the specified uses of money under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.307, the amount of this appropriation designated for asset preservation may be used to replace buildings that are in poor condition, outdated, and no longer support the work of the Minnesota Zoological Garden and to construct and renovate trails and roads on the Minnesota Zoological Garden site. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $21,475,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end